data/hungarian.aff
SFX R Y 743
SFX R   ö    őjükül       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjükön       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[SUE]
SFX R   ö    őjükéül      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjükéért     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjükévé      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjükével     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjükétől     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjükét       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjükéről     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjükért      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjükére      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjükénél     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjükének     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjükén       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiül     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiért    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjükéivé     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjükéivel    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjükéitől    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéit      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiről    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéire     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéinél    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjükéinek    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjükéin      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiig     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX R   ö    őjükéihöz    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéig      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiből    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX R   ö    őjükéiben    ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX R   ö    őjükéibe     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéi       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX R   ö    őjükéhöz     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX R   ö    őjükéből     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX R   ö    őjükében     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX R   ö    őjükébe      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX R   ö    őjüké        ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX R   ö    őjüktől      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjükről      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjükre       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjüknél      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjüknek      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjükként     ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[FORM]
SFX R   ö    őjükké       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjükkor      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[TEMP]
SFX R   ö    őjükkel      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjükig       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[TERM]
SFX R   ö    őjükhöz      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ALL]
SFX R   ö    őjüket       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjükből      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ELA]
SFX R   ö    őjükben      ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[INE]
SFX R   ö    őjükbe       ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[ILL]
SFX R   ö    őjük         ö                         [POSS_PL_3]+[NOM]
SFX R   ö    őjéül        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjééül       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjééért      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjéévé       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjéével      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjéétől      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjéét        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjééről      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjéért       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjéére       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjéénél      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjéének      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjéén        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX R   ö    őjééiül      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX R   ö    őjééiért     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX R   ö    őjééivé      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjééivel     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjééitől     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjééit       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjééiről     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjééire      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjééinél     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjééinek     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjééin       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX R   ö    őjééiig      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX R   ö    őjééihez     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX R   ö    őjééig       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX R   ö    őjééiből     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX R   ö    őjééiben     ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX R   ö    őjééibe      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX R   ö    őjééi        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX R   ö    őjééhez      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX R   ö    őjééből      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX R   ö    őjéében      ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX R   ö    őjéébe       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX R   ö    őjéé         ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX R   ö    őjévé        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[TRANS]
SFX R   ö    őjével       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[INSTR]
SFX R   ö    őjétől       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[ABL]
SFX R   ö    őjét         ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[ACC]
SFX R   ö    őjéről       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[DEL]
SFX R   ö    őjére        ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[SBL]
SFX R   ö    őjénél       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[ADE]
SFX R   ö    őjének       ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[DAT]
SFX R   ö    őjén         ö                         [POSS_SG_3]+[SUE]
