data/hungarian.dic
órajelző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
álpereszke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
Érselind/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
vízállásmérő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vesepecsenye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
törmeléklejtő-erdő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tramini/ŐAUBVLQRĘŽËŻijĎĐÓáéçč˛łÄäĂăYcˇť¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tejci/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szüle/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szoliter/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szelence/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
serpenyő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
rotaprint/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pólyakötő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pint/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ov.-/LVÓ×nRTtj	ov.[abr]{+[NOM]}
nitrofilm/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
mélyítő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
meszesvödör/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l	[noun]{+[NOM]}
magánember/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
lignit/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
laude/BŐÓĐVR	[adv]
kötelező/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kányafű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝Řl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kivégző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
keresztyén/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kHz-/LVÓ×nRTtj	kHz[noun]{+[NOM]}
illető/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
hokedli/ŐAUBVLQRĘŽËŻijĎĐÓáéçč˛łÄäĂăYcˇť¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
hajósnép/wYVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
gyapjúszövőmunkásnő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺc¸˝w	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝Ř	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fodorkel/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fejbőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁáRTtYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
eperhere/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ecset/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
difi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
csuklóvédő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
cetvelő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
bukószél/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl	[noun]{+[NOM]}
bendő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
anyagcsere/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ültetett/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
őrült/Ô×nGVĚNRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
éghetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
vizetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
törvénytelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
tiszteletbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
sárgászöld/Ô×nGVĚNMRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
szerzetesi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
sokévenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
rendbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
otthonlévő/ąwCÔŐĐHWĚR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
nyeszlett/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
mértéktelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
megözvegyült/Ô×nGVĚNRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
magasfeszültségű/ąCÔŐĐHWĚR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
ledér/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
kétlendő/ąCÔŐĐHWĚR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
kisemmizett/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
keresztüli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
istentelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
hétóránkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
helvét/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
gyűjtött/Ô×nGVĚNRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
félénk/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
felföldi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
enyhített/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
eleven/Ó×nGVËLRlą	[adj]{+[NOM]}
diofantoszi/°BÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
botfülű/ąCÔŐĐHWĚR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
Zsanett/UVĘŽËŻijÖ×KLmnŇÓqÇżßČQRˇ¸kl	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Vinkler/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Tuffier/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Sáromberke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Szentlélek/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Senye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Rubányi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Pusztaszentpéter/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Paschberger/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Nemesapáti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Mitsubishi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Magyarmecske/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Lehomér/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Krüger/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Kisciklin/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
KTM-/LVÓ×nRTtj	KTM[abr]{+[NOM]}
HÖK-ös/Ô×nCHWMR	HÖK[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
Hamupipőke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Gige/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Fetser/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Espersit/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Drávalványi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Csépe/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Bónyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Biste/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Balatonmáriafürdő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Almakerék/VËŻj×LnÓqśR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
